Hawaii statutes.
§414-383 Articles of dissolution. (a)
At any time after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by
delivering to the department director for filing articles of dissolution
setting forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The date dissolution was authorized;

(3) If dissolution was approved by the shareholders;

(A) The number of votes entitled to be cast
on the proposal to dissolve; and

(B) Either the total number of votes cast for
and against dissolution or the total number of undisputed votes cast for
dissolution and a statement that the number cast for dissolution was sufficient
for approval; and

(4) If voting by voting groups was required, the
information required by paragraph (3) must be separately provided for each
voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan to dissolve.

(b) A corporation is dissolved upon the
effective date of its articles of dissolution. The articles of dissolution may
specify a delayed effective time and date, and if it does so the document becomes
effective at the time and date specified. If a delayed effective date but no
time is specified, the document shall be effective at the close of business on
that date. A delayed effective date for a document may not be later than the
thirtieth day after the date it is filed. [L 2000, c 244, pt of §1; am L 2001,
c 129, §39]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next